en: Frozen salads
de: Gefrorene Salate
es: Ensaladillas congeladas
fr: Salades congelées
hr: Smrznute salate

en: Frozen Rice with vegetables
es: Arroces con vegetales congelados
fr: Riz aux légumes congelés
hr: Smrznuta riža s povrćem
nl: Diepvriesrijst met groente

en: Frozen baked potatoes
da: Frosne bagte kartofler
es: Patatas panadera congeladas
fr: Pommes de terre cuites surgelées, pommes de terre cuites congelées
hr: Smrznuti pečeni krumpir
nl: Diepvries gebakken aardappelen

en: Frozen vegetable tempura
es: Tempuras de verduras congeladas
fr: Tempura de légumes congelée
hr: Tempura od smrznutog povrća
nl: Diepvries groentetempuras

en: Frozen vegetables for paella
es: Vegetales para paella congelados

en: Breaded onion rings, onion rings
es: Aros de cebolla empanados
fr: Rondelles d'oignon panées, Onion rings panés, Onion rings
hr: Pohani kolutići luka
nl: Gepaneerde uienringen

en: Frozen cereals
es: Cereales congelados
fr: Céréales surgelés
hr: Smrznute žitarice
nl: Diepvriesgranen

en: Frozen corn, Frozen maize, Frozen sweet corn
es: Maíz congelado
fr: Maïs surgelé, Maïs doux surgelé
hr: Smrznuti kukuruz
it: Mais surgelato
nl: Diepvriesmais

en: Frozen corn kernels
es: Maíz en grano congelado, Granos de maíz congelados
fr: Grains de maïs surgelés
hr: Smrznuta zrna kukuruza
nl: Diepvriesmaiskorrels

en: Frozen corn on the cob, Frozen sweet corn on the cob
de: Gefrorene Maise
es: Maíz en mazorca congelado, Mazorcas de maíz congeladas
fr: Maïs en épis surgelé, Épis de maïs surgelé, Maïs doux en épis surgelé
hr: Smrznuti klip kukuruza

en: Frozen pre-cooked rice
de: Gefrorene vorgekochte Reise
es: Arroz precocido congelado, Arroz congelado
fr: Riz précuits congelés
hr: Smrznuta prethodno kuhana riža
nl: Diepvries voorgekookte rijst

en: Frozen vegetables
bg: Замразени зеленчици
ca: Verdures congelades
da: Frosne grøntsager
de: Tiefkühl-Gemüse
es: Verduras y hortalizas congeladas, Hortalizas congeladas, Verduras congeladas
fi: vihannespakasteet
fr: Légumes surgelés
he: ירקות קפואים
hr: Smrznuto povrće
hu: Fagyasztott zöldségek
it: Verdure surgelate
ja: 冷凍野菜
nl: Diepvriesgroentes
pl: Mrożone warzywa
pt: Legumes congelados
ru: Замороженные овощи
tr: Dondurulmuş sebze
zh: 冷藏蔬菜

en: Frozen artichokes
de: Tiefkühl-Artischocken
es: Alcachofas congeladas
fr: Artichauts surgelés
hr: Smrznute artičoke
it: Carciofo surgelato
nl: Diepvries artisjokken

en: Frozen artichoke hearts
de: Tiefkühl-Artischockenherzen
es: Corazones de alcachofas congelados
fr: Coeurs d'artichauts surgelés
hr: Smrznuta srca artičoka
nl: Diepvries artisjokharten

en: Frozen baby artichokes
de: Tiefkühl-Babyartischocken
es: Alcachofas baby congeladas
fr: Artichauts baby surgelés
hr: Smrznute mlade artičoke
nl: Diepvries baby-artisjokken

en: Frozen chopped artichokes
de: Tiefgekühlte gehackte Artischocken
es: Alcachofas troceadas congeladas
fr: Artichauts hachés surgelés
hr: Smrznute nasjeckane artičoke
it: Carciofi tritati congelati
nl: Diepvries gehakte artisjokken

en: Frozen Brussels sprouts
de: Tiefkühl-Rosenkohl
es: Coles de Bruselas congeladas
fr: Choux de Bruxelles surgelés
hr: Smrznute prokulice
nl: Diepvriesspruitjes

en: Frozen cooked Brussels sprouts
fr: Choux de Bruxelles surgelés cuits

en: Cooked Brussels sprouts
fr: Choux de Bruxelles cuits

en: Frozen carrots
bg: Замразени моркови
de: Tiefkühl-Karotten
es: Zanahorias congeladas
fi: pakastetut porkkanat
fr: Carottes surgelées
hr: Smrznuta mrkva
it: Carote surgelate
nl: Diepvrieswortels
pl: Marchew mrożona
pt: Cenouras congeladas
tr: Dondurulmuş Havuç